Hawaii statutes.
§454F-1.6 Presumption of control.
An individual is presumed to control a mortgage loan originator company if that
individual is a director, general partner, managing member, or executive
officer who directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten per cent or more
of a class of voting securities or has the power to sell or direct the sale of
ten per cent or more of a class of voting securities of that licensee or
applicant. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2012, c 252, §4; am L 2013, c 168, §4;
am L 2016, c 122, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next